New York, session 2025-2026, S5899.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 "Cesar's law". 3 § 2. Paragraph (i) of subdivision 3 of section 259-i of the executive 4 law, as amended by section 38-f-1 of subpart A of part C of chapter 62 5 of the laws of 2011, is amended to read as follows: 6 (i) Where there is reasonable cause to believe that a presumptive 7 releasee, parolee, conditional releasee or person under post-release 8 supervision has absconded from supervision the board [may] shall declare 9 such person to be delinquent and a warrant shall be issued for the 10 retaking of such person and for such person's temporary detention 11 according to the rules of the board, and the board shall immediately 12 notify the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction of the locality in 13 which such absconder resides. This paragraph shall not be construed to 14 deny such person a preliminary revocation hearing upon [his] such 15 person's retaking, nor to relieve the department of any obligation it 16 may have to exercise due diligence to retake the alleged absconder, nor 17 to relieve the parolee or releasee of any obligation [he] such person 18 may have to comply with the conditions of [his] such person's release. 19 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10503-01-5